Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1006
Act, how construed.

The Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of such act among states enacting it.

Laws 1969, c. 433, § 6, p. 1459;

Laws 1988, LB 933, § 7.